Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.363

Washington state legacy project—Oral histories—Advisory council.

(1) The secretary of state shall administer and conduct a program to record and document oral histories of current and former members and staff of the Washington state executive and judicial branches, the state's congressional delegation, and other citizens who have participated in the political history of Washington state. The program shall be called the Washington state legacy project. The secretary of state may contract with independent oral historians or history departments of the state universities to interview and record oral histories. The manuscripts and publications shall be made available for research and reference through the state archives. The transcripts, together with current and historical photographs, may be published for distribution to libraries and the general public, and be posted on the secretary of state's website.

(2) The Washington state legacy project may act as a principal repository for oral histories related to community, family, and other various projects.

(3) The oral history of a person who occupied positions, or was staff to a person who occupied positions, in more than one branch of government shall be conducted by the entity authorized to conduct oral histories of persons in the position last held by the person who is the subject of the oral history. However, the person being interviewed may select the entity he or she wishes to prepare his or her oral history.

(4) The secretary of state may create a Washington state legacy project advisory council to provide advice and guidance on matters pertaining to operating the legacy project. The secretary of state may not compensate members of the legacy project advisory council but may provide reimbursement to members for expenses that are incurred in the conduct of their official duties.

[ 2008 c 222 s 10.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.